Hawaii statutes.
[§128D-9] Injunctive relief.
The director may institute a civil action in any environmental court of
competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief to prevent any violation of this
chapter, of any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, or of any order issued
pursuant to this chapter. The environmental court shall grant relief in
accordance with the Hawaii rules of civil procedure. [L 1990, c 298, pt of §17;
am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next